Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-210
Amendments; election; duties of county clerk or election commissioner.

The county clerk or election commissioner of each county shall see that the list of voters book and the official summary of votes cast furnished each voting precinct are suitably printed and ruled so as to enable the election officers to make returns of the votes cast on the various propositions or amendments submitted and to enable the election officers to make full and complete returns of the facts required of them to be made to the county clerk or election commissioner.

Laws 1895, c. 5, § 6, p. 71;

Laws 1897, c. 5, § 1, p. 46;

R.S.1913, § 3707;

C.S.1922, § 3095;

C.S.1929, § 49-210;

R.S.1943, § 49-210;

Laws 1973, LB 554, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 562.